District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.55

Discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative proceeding shall not be discontinued or settled without the Superior Court’s approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the corporation’s shareholders or a class of shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the shareholders affected.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-305.57.